Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.34
Scrap metal processor, defined.

Scrap metal processor
means any person engaged in the business of buying vehicles, motorcycles,
or parts thereof for the purpose of remelting or processing into scrap metal
or who otherwise processes ferrous or nonferrous metallic scrap for resale.

No scrap metal
processor shall sell vehicles or motorcycles without obtaining a wrecker or
salvage dealer license.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 46.